Washington statutes.
RCW 10.99.055

Enforcement of orders.

A peace officer in this state shall enforce an order issued by any court in this state restricting a defendant's ability to have contact with a victim by arresting and taking the defendant into custody, pending release on bail, personal recognizance, or court order, when the officer has probable cause to believe that the defendant has violated the terms of that order.

[ 1984 c 263 s 25; 1983 c 232 s 9; 1981 c 145 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 232: See note following RCW 9.41.010.